output/hyph-id.level4.pat.txt
.aba3h
.aba4l
.aba4r
.abe3
.abu4k
.acak3
.ad3io
.aduk3
.af3al
.af3r
.aga3h4
.aga4r
.ago3
.ag3r
.air2
.ai3ra
.ai4s
.aja4
.ajak3
.ajar3
.ajo3
.aka3b
.aka4l
.aka4n3
.ak3lo
.al2a
.ala4p
.alas3
.ala3t
.alem3
.alut4
.am2a
.amuk3
.an4a
.ang4a
.angi3
.ap3l
.ap3r
.ar2a
.ara4k
.ara4m3
.arka3
.as2a
.asa4m3
.asul3
.as3w
.at2a
.at3ud
.au3t
.awa4r
.awi3
.aya2
.ayak3
.ba3h4a
.ba3ki
.ba3l4a
.ba3r4a
.ba3sa
.ba3t4a
.ba3ti
.be4ra
.be3sa
.bi3h
.bi3la
.bi3sa
.bo3ha
.bo3ki
.bo3la
.bo3sa
.bo3t
.bu3ka
.bu3la
.bu3ni
.bu1t
.ca3ki
.ca3p4a
.car4
.ca3ra
.ce3ra
.ci3l
.co3l
.cua3t
.cu3l2
.cu3ma
.cu3ti
.da3h4a
.da3hi
.da3ki
.da3m4a
.da3mi
.de3ka
.del4a
.de3ra
.di3e
.di3pa
.dip3l
.di3tr
.do3ka
.do3la
.do3r4a
.du3ka
.du3pi
.ece2
.ef3l
.eg3r
.ek3l
.el2a
.elo1
.embi4
.ena2
.enak3
.era2
.ere4
.erek3
.faa3
.fi3la
.fi2r
.ga3k
.ga3l4a
.ga3ma
.ga3p4a
.gapu3
.ga3r4a
.gat4
.ga3ti
.ge3t
.gi3r
.goi3
.go3s
.go3t
.gu3la
.gu3p
.ha3s4a
.ha3ti
.haya3
.hi3l
.ho3k
.ho3li
.hu1t
.ikan3
.ika4t3
.iku2
.ikur3
.ikut3
.ilat3
.imig3
.in2a
.in3ad
.in3ar
.in3ef
.in3er
.ingi4
.in3ok
.in3os
.ir2a
.iri3t
.ja1h2
.ja3m4a
.ja3p
.ja3r4a
.ji3r
.jo3ra
.jo3t
.ju3ni
.ju3r4a
.ka3h4a
.ka3ki
.ka3l4a
.ka3n4a
.ka3p4a
.ka3r4a
.ka3t4a
.ka3ti
.ke3sw
.ke3ta
.kia4s
.ki1h
.ki3l2
.ki3n4a
.ki3r4a
.ko3h
.ko3ki
.ko3la
.ko3na
.kop3l
.ko3ra
.kro3n
.ku3l4a
.ku3m4a
.ku3pi
.kut4
.ku3ta
.ku3ti
.la1h2
.la3m4a
.lap2
.la3pa
.la3ra
.lep3r
.le3sa
.liku3
.li3la
.li3ma
.li3n4a
.li3pa
.li3sa
.lo3k4a
.lo3ki
.lo3na
.lo3ra
.lo3t
.lu3p
.lu3ti
.ma3ir
.ma3ka
.mal4a
.ma3ni
.ma3pr
.ma3ra
.mas4a
.ma3t4a
.ma3ti
.mig3r
.mi3ra
.mis4a
.mos3t
.mu3n4a
.mut4
.na3hi
.na3i
.na3ut
.ng4
.ni3s4a
.ni3t
.no2n
.nut2
.nu3ta
.nut3r
.oba2
.ob1l
.oda3
.odo3r
.ok1l
.olo2
.omo2
.on2a
.ongo4
.op3l
.opo3s
.op3r
.ora4
.os3p
.os3t
.otak3
.oven3
.pa3ka
.pa3ma
.pa3r4a
.pa3s4a
.pa4us
.pe3ka
.pe3t4a
.pi3ra
.po3l4a
.poli3
.po3ra
.pu3ki
.pu3l4a
.pu3n4a
.pu3ti
.rai3r
.ra3p
.ra3r
.rara3
.ra3s4a
.re3gr
.re3ka
.re3sa
.re3u
.ri3b
.ros3t
.ro3t2
.ru3ha
.ru3ka
.ru1t2
.sa3fa
.sa3h4a
.sa3hi
.sa3ki
.sa3la
.sa3m4a
.sa3r4a
.sa3sa
.sa3ti
.sa3uk3
.se3h
.se3ka
.sel4a
.se3sa
.se3ta
.si3na
.si3ni
.so3t
.su3ka
.su3ki
.su3m4a
.su3n4a
.sut2
.su3ta
.tab3l
.ta3h4a
.ta3hi
.ta3m4a
.ta3na
.ta3r4a
.te3ka
.te3ki
.tel4a
.te3ma
.te2r
.ti3ba
.ti1h
.til4
.ti3la
.tir4
.ti3ra
.ti3s
.tol2
.to3la
.to3ma
.tro3p
.tu3hi
.tu3m4a
.tu3n4a
.tu3ni
.tu3p
.tu3ri
.ua2
.ub4
.uba2
.ubu4
.ubur3
.uga2
.uge4
.uja2
.ul2a
.ulak3
.ulam3
.um2a
.umi2
.ung4a4
.up2
.ura4
.usi2
.usik3
.ut2
.uta4
.utak3
.ut3r
.wa3h4a
.wa3hi
.wa3ni
.wa3sa
.wa3t2
.we3t4
.wu1t
.ya3ki
.ya3ng
.yu3d
.za3ir
.za3ma
a3a
aa2f1
aala2
aa2li
aa3r
aa4t1
a1b
a3ba.
3abadi
abah4a
abai3
3abaik
aba4k
ab3akr
ab3aks
aba3s
abata3
abeda3
abeku3
3abena
abe3ra
a3bir
abi4ri
abi4si
ab1l
1abn
abobo3
ab3r
1abs
abuh1
abu2r
abu3s
a1c
aca2k
aca2p
4acar.
ace2
acem3
acet1
2aci
aci2k
acili3
acing4
aci3t2
a2c3r
acu4k
acu2m3
a1d
4adah
2adal
adali3
2adas
adas4a
ada4t
3adeg
1adeh
ade2p
adesa4
a3di
4adi.
4adia
adi1h
1adil
4adim
1adm
1adop
ad3r
1ads
1adud
adur4a
adu1t2
1adv
a1e
2aeh
a2e1k
a3el
ae3r
a2ero3
a1f
a2fan
afa3u
1afd
afi3b4
afik4
a2f1l
a3flo
af3ru
a1g
ag2a
aga2h1
aga2i
a3gand
aga3si
agas4k
agen4a
agesa3
aget4a
ag2h
a3gha
a3g2i
4agi.
a2gl
ag3la
ag2o
ago3k2
ago4na
a2gr
ag3rat
1agre
ag3ri
agu3ka
agul2
2agu2m
agum3a
agut1
a3ha.
a3hab
a3hak
a3hani
ah3any
ahari3
ah3art
a1haw
4ahe
ahe2m
a2hen
ah3eng
a1hir
ah3ism
ahit3
a1hiy
a1ho
ah1og
a3hon
4ahu
a3hu.
a3hua
a2hub
ahu3r
ah1uy
a1iah
a1ib.
aib3an
aibi3
a1ibk
ai3br
a1id
a3id.
a1if
a1ih
a1ik.
a3ikat
a2iku
a1il.
ail2a
a3ilau
a1ilk
a1ilm
a1ilo
aima4l
a3imb
a1i2n
ai3ny
ai3p
a1ir
ai4ri
a1is
a3is.
a2i3sa
a2isy
a1it
a3it.
ai2ta
a3iti
a1iw
a1iy
a1j
aja4ri
ajat4a
aje4r
ajir3a
aj1l
1ajo
aj3r
aju3m2
ajung4
1ajus
aka4ba
a2kac
ak3acu
a2k1ag
ak3aja
akam4a
ak3asl
ak3aut
ak1ef
ak1eg
ak3ema
ak3ent
a3ker
ak3esa
ak3har
ak3hu
akia3
1akib
a2kic
aki1h
aki2m
ak3imb
akina3
akin3y
ak3isa
aki2t
ak1l
ak3la
a3ko
a4kob
a4kog
4akok
3akomo
a4kot
a2koy
2akp
ak3r
akroa3
akro3n
aks2
3aksar
ak3st
aku3k
ak3und
a1l
a3lant
aleba3
3alial
1alie
a3lif
1ali2h
ali3la
a3lin
3aline
ali4r
a3lis.
a3lit
3alkal
1alko
alo3ki
alon3a
alot2
alto3
alu3k
2alum
alu3ma
alu2n
alu4r
a2man
amapa3
a3mau
ambah3
ambai3
4ambak
4ambi.
3ambis
3ambiy
ambo3k
ambuk3
amel4a
2amer
amla3
amoda3
among4
amo4t
2ampa
ampak3
ampir3
ampu4r
2amu
2ana
a3na3g
anal4a
3anali
3analo
an1an
anang4
ana3pa
ana3pl
2anci
2and
3andam
anda4s
andek3
ando3k
an1ed
1aneh
an1ej
ane4n
an3eng
an3eur
2ang
a3ngab
ang3ac
a3ngaj
a3ngak
ang3al
a3ngap
a3ngar
a3ngas
a3ngat
a3nge
ang4i
a3ngik
a3ngil
a3ngin
a3ngir
a3ngis
3anglo
a1ngo
4ango.
a1ngu
a3ngur
angu3t4
2anh
2ani
ania3
3aniay
an3iko
a3nin
aning3
ani3r2
an3iri
anja4l
4anjan
anja4r
4anji
anju2
2ank
2anl
2anm
1ann
2a3no
anod3r
4anog
ano3m
an3ont
an3opt
2anr
2ans
ans3p
2ant
3antep
antil4
anu3g
anu3ma
an3ura
anut3
2anv
2a3ny
anya4k
an3z
a1o
a2oe
ao2k1
a3op
a1p
a2pac
apahe3
apak3i
3apam
a2p1an
3apart
apas4a
ape3k
a2pen
ap3ena
apes3a
ape3t4
3apiap
api3l2
a3pi3r
a3pi4s
ap1l
aplak3
1ap3li
3aplu
apme1
a3po
3apolo
3apote
a2pr
a4p3rat
3ap3ri
ap3rof
ap3rog
a3pron
ap3rop
ap3ru
ap2si
ap3st
a4p3ud
apu1t
1aqs
a3ra.
ar2ak
ara3kr
a3rana
ara4ng
ara4ni
a3rans
a3rant
ara4pi
ar4as
arce1
aret1
argu3
3arihk
a3rik
a3riu
arman4
arma3t4
arn2
a4rond
a2ror
4arse1
arta3k
a3ru.
arua3n
aru3ka
aru3ki
aru4l
aru2m
arung3
aru3ni
aru2s
arus4a
aru3si
a1s
as3agu
asa4h
asai4
asa3ki
as1an
a3sand
asa2p
asar4a
3asas.
3asask
ase3ka
as3emp
asia4l4
a3sik
3asimi
asi4ng3
3asini
3asink
asi2s
3askas
as3kr
as3la
3asmar
asme4
a3so
1aspi
as2po
3asram
as3ti
as4til
asu2h1
asuk1
3asums
2asus
a2sy
1asyi
asyik3
a1t
a2ta
a3tab
a3ta3g
ata3in
ata3ka
at1an
atan4a
ata4ni
a3tans
a3tant
ata2p
3atapk
ata3pl
ata2s
4atasi
a3ta4t
ata3us
a3tay
ate3ki
at3emp
ate3ra
at3ha
at4he
a3thi
a2ti.
atif4a
ati3kr
ati3ma
ating4
ati3p
ati4ra
a3tis
ato3b
ato3h
a4t3ore
atos3f
at3r
3atrib
a2ua
a3uco
1audi
a3uh.
a2uha
aui1
a1uk.
au3ka
a1ukp
a2uku
a3ul.
a1ulh
aulu3
a3ulua
a1um.
au2ma
aume1
1aumk
a1un
a3un.
a3ung
auni4
a3up.
au3pi
a1ur
a3ur.
a3uran
aur3au
a3urin
a3uro
a3us.
a1ut
a3uta
a3utk
1auto
a1uw
a1uy
a2uz
a1v
a1w
a3wa
4awa.
awa2k
2awal
3awale
awa4ng
4awar
awa4s
2awat
awer2
1awet
2a3wi
awig3
awo3k
awu2t
a1x
a1y
a3ya
aya3ki
aya2l1
aya2r
1ayom
ayu2b
ayud3h
3ayuna
3ayunk
ayur4a
a1z
a3zi
babak3
babat4
baca3k4
3bad
ba4dab
bada4n
3bag
ba3ga
3bah
ba4h3ab
ba4ham
ba3he
bah3ub
ba1i2b
ba2id
ba1i2k
3baj
baji4k3
3bak
ba4kan
ba4kh
4bakr
3bal
bale3
bali2
balik3
balin4
b1amp
ban4a
ba4n3ol
banto3
bapak3
bap3l
ba3pr
bara3h4
bara3p4
ba4ri.
baria3
ba4rib
baro3s
ba3ru
ba4rum
baru3s
ba4sab
3bat
bata3r4
ba1u
bawa3k
baya3t
2b1b
4b3d
3be.
bebal4
beca2
be3f
be3ha
3bei
bek1l
b2el
bel2a
bel3aj
be4lem
be4li.
belu3h
bena4r
be3nga
be3nge
be3ngi
be3ngo
be3ngu
beni3t
be2n1o
benum3
bep3h
3be2r
ber3ad
ber3ag
bera3h4
be4rap
ber3ar
be4rat
ber3aw
ber3ay
be4ref
ber3ej
ber3ev
ber3im
ber3ir
ber3is
ber3iu
ber3ob
berok4
ber3ol
ber3op
bero3t
ber3ud
ber3ul
be3si
bete3k
bete3s
b1etn
betu2
2b1f
2b1g
2b2h2
bhu1
bia2k1
bian3i
bi2b1a
3bic
bi4d3ah
bida4s
bi3f
bi3g
3bik
bi3kr
biku3
bi4lal
bi4lam
bima3
bin2a
bi3ngi
bi3ni
bio1k
bio3sf
bio4sk
bi3p4
bis4a
bisi4k3
bi4sk
bi2ta
bi3t4i
biul3
2b1j
bja2d
2b3k
bku1
bkut2
2bl
bla2g
bla2k1
blawa3
b2le.
bles1
b1li
b2lo.
3b2log
blon3a
blos3
b1lu
blubu3
2b1m
2b1n
b2o
3bo.
bodo3l
3boi
bo2k4a
bo3li
bolo3s
3bon
bon2a
bong4a
bo3nge
bo4ngo
bo4p3l
b3oral
bosi3
bo4si.
bos3t
botek3
bot3is
bo4t3r
2b3p
2b2r2
bra2k
brak3a
b4ra3t
b4ri.
3b4rid.
bris4
bro3b
brono3
bruk1
b4rut
2b3s4
bse4
bsosi4
2b3t
3bu
bua3ni
bu2bi
budak3
bud3h
bu2ha
bu2he
bu2il
bu2ka
bu1kh
bul2a
bula3h
bulak3
bu3lis
bu4lub
buluk3
bun3ab
bu2ni
bu3rad
bu4ri.
but3um
2b1v
2b1w
2b1y
bya2
byak1
byo2
2b1z
cab4
cabi2
cabik3
ca3br
cabu2
cabul3
cada2
ca3e
ca3hi
ca1il
ca1im
ca3ir
ca4k3an
cak3ic
ca3kri
ca1kw
ca3l
ca4l3en
ca2ma
can3ac
ca2ni
cap3ac
cap3l
ca3pr
cara3k
ca2ti
ca3t4r
cat2s
ca1ul
ca1us
cebu2
ce2h
cek3ec
ce3ki
cek1l
cek4le
ceku3k
celi1
cema4
cemar3
ce3nge
ce3ngi
ce3ngu
cepek3
cep3l
cera3k
ceria3
cermi4
cetek3
ce2u
2c2h
ciba2
cibak3
cib3l
ci2l
ci3li
ci3lu
cima3
cin2a
cinta3
ci3pa3
cip1l
ci3ru
ci2s1
cocol3
co2k
coke3
co4k1l
co3ko
co4kr
col2a
colek3
come2
co3nge
co4p1l
core2
co2ta
c4r
cri2
cuat4a
cu4atk
cub2
cu3blu
cui2
cu3k
culi2
culik3
cum2a
cu2ni
cu3nia
cupli4
cu3ru
cut1
d2a
3daa
da2ba
dab3an
da4bi.
dada4k3
da2em
dag4
3dah
dahta3
da2id
da2i1h
da1il
dai3m
da3im.
dai3ni
dai3r
dak3l
3dal
dalem3
dali3m
damar3
da2mi
dam3id
damu2
dan3an
da2ne
d3anim
danu4
da4n3yo
da2pa
da2p1e
da2pi
dap3in
dap3r
3dar
da4ri.
da4ris
da3ru
3da3t
dato3
datok4
da1ud
4dav
da2ve
dawa4t
2d1b
2d1d
3de
2deal
de3f
de3g
degil3
de3im
de3iy
de3kra
dek4s
deks3a
de4la
dela3p4
de3ma
de4na
de3nge
de3ngi
de3ngu
de4ni.
depo3s
dep3r
depu3
der4a
derek3
der4n
dero3b
de3sa
desak3
de4sor
det4
deti2
detik3
de3tr
de3u
d1f
2d1g
d2h2
d3he
3dia
dia3kr
dia3sk
diat4
di3b
di2f3r
dig3l
di3gra
dika3t
di3kr
dila3t4
di4l3aw
dile3
di2li
di3ma
di3n2a
dini3
di4oni
dio3s
di2pi
di3pr
di4s3ab
di4sek
dis3h
di4sin
di2so
dis3op
3dit
2d1j
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
dma3s
dmi3t
2d3n2
doa3k
dob3l
do2e
dogol3
doh3a
do2id
dok2a
dol4a
dolak4
dol3od
do3ma
doma4n
do3nge
do3ni
d3oral
do4ri.
do3sa
dose4
doser3
do3sf
do3s4k
do2s3o
dos3t
do2t
do3to
do1u
4d1p
2d2r2
3d4ram
dra3ti
3d4raz
dre4l
dres3a
drob3l
d3romo
dron2
dro3na
dro3s
druk1
2d3s4
2d1t
3du
du4ay
du4ban
du3ble
du2k
du3kh
dulu3
dulur4
du3ni
du2p
duri3
du3ru
dut1
du2te
du2ti
2d1v
2dw
2dy
dya3
d1yu
2dz.
e3a
ea3i2
eaib1
eajuk3
eaka2
eakal3
eakan3
eak4r
eala4
ealak3
eal4i
ealim3
ea3m2a
ea3ngi
eape4
eara2
earab3
earti4
ea3t4
e4atr
ea1us
eazam3
e1b
eba3i
ebaik3
eba2k1
eba4ni
ebar4a
ebaro3
eba3ti
eba3u
ebek3i
ebe4ng
ebe3re
ebe3ro
ebi3l
eb1l
eb3la
eblag3
eboh3a
ebo2m3
ebo3s
eb3r
ebu3l
2e1c
eci2k1
eci3na
ecoh3
e2c3r
ecu3pl
e1d
2ed.
e3da
eda2k
eda3l
e3di
edo3ka
ed3r
edro2
edrop3
edu3pl
e3dw
e1e
ee2li
eelo4
eema4
eena2
eenak3
e1f
3efek.
e4flo
e2fr
ef3ro
e1g
eg2a
ega1i
ega2k
ega3kr
ega3ma
egan3i
egat4r
egeda3
eget4
eg2i
e2g4l
eg3le
eg2o
ego2g3
2egol
e2gr
eg3ren
e3gri.
eg4ro
eg4u
eguk1
egu3l
e1h
e3ha.
e3hal
e2han
eha4ng
eh3ank
e3har
eha3ti
e3he
e4hek
ehi3l
eh1ol
ehu1
e1i
e3iba
ei4bu
eido4
e2ie
e3if
e2ig
e2ih
e2ij
eima4
eimam3
e3ine
eing4
e3ism
e2it
eit3r
e2iy
e3j
eja3i
ejail3
eja3ka
eja4l
3ejane
ejap3
eja3u
1ejaw
ejuk1
ek2ad
ek2ak
ek2al
ekalo3
e2kan
ekas4a
ekbe3
eke4h
ek3emp
eke4n
eken3a
e1kh
eki4k
ekik3a
e3klas
e4k3le
ek3lin
ek1lu
e3kol
3ekono
eko3p
ekop3i
eko4re
eko3st
ek3r
ek4ra
e3krim
1eksp
ek4sud
ekto3
ektu4r3
e4kub
ek3uc
ek3ud.
1ekui
eku4is
eku3l2
ekula3
ekutu3
ek3we
e1l
e3la
3elabo
elai4k
e2laj
elami4
elara4
e3le
ele3pr
el2i
e3lia
eli3b
e3lik
eli3ki
3elimi
e3lir
elisi4
3elite
eliu4
el3m
e3lo
elo3ki
e4lokk
elo4ni
1elue
eluh4a
elu3l
elu3ma
e4lunj
em2a
emab4
ema3gl
emala4
emap3r
ema3ti
ema3u
embat4
embi3l
emel2
eme4ng
1emig4
emi3l
emi3ni
emi3ta
e3m2le
e3mo
emo1k
emo3ra
emo3s4
3emosi
emoto4
empik3
empi3r
empo3r
3empot
empun4
em2ro
3emuls
emu3ni
e3na
enah4
ena3ik3
3enape
3enask
ena3ut
3encel
endu4s
e3ne
ene3ma
eng3in
e4ngip
e4ngiu
eng3ol
e4ngot
e4ngoy
e4ngut
en2i
eni3ma
en3ise
enja3r4
enja3t
1enkr
enob3l
eno3sf
enpe2
en3s
ente3k
entuk3
e3nzi.
e1o
eo3b4
eodo3
eog4
eo3i
eok2a
eo1kl
e3ol
eomor3
eo3pr
eo3s4
eot2
eot3an
eotro3
eo3ts
e1p
epa3b
epa2s
e3pe
epem3r
epe3ra
epe4s
ep2h
epi3sp
ep1l
e3po
e2pr
ep3ra.
e3pras
eprep3
ep3ret
ep3ri.
e3pria
ep4ro
epro3g
ep3ru
ep3s
e3ra.
e3raa
er3ade
er3adu3
er3afi
e3rafo
er3ahl
er3a3ir3
e3rak.
er3akt
e4raku
e3ral.
er3ala
e3ram.
e3rame
e3rami
er3amn
er3amo
e4ran.
er3ane
e3rans
er3anu
e3rap
er3apr
er3aro
er3aru
e3ras.
e3rase
e3rask
er3ast
e3rat
erat3e
e3rau.
er3aur
e3rawi
e3re.
e3rea
e3reh
e3rei
e3rek.
e3reka
e3rem.
e3rep
e2rer
er3ere
er3eru
e3ret.
e3reta
e3rete
er3f
erha3t
e3ri.
e3ria
e3ribe
e3rida
er3ide
er3idu
er3ija
e3rik.
e3riki
er3ikl
e3riko
er3ikr
er3ikt
e3ril.
e3rili
er3ilu
eri3ma
e3rime
e3rin.
eri3na
er3ink
er3ins
er3ion
eri3p
e2r1ir
e3rit
e3riw
e3riy
e2r1iz
erjo3r
erna3l
e3ro.
e3robe
e3robo
e3rod
e3rof
erog3l
e3rok.
e3roka
er3ola
e3ron
er3opi
er3ora
er3osm
e3roso
erot2
ero3ti
3erotk
e3roy
e3ru.
e3ruas
er3uba
er1uf
e3rui
e3ruk.
e3ruka
er3ula
e3ruma
eru3ni
e3rup.
er1ur
e3rus.
e1s
1esae
esa2k
3esake
4esa2n
esa2p
esa2u
esbe3
2ese
esek1
esi1h2
esip3r
e3sis
es3kr
e3so
1esok
es3pr
e3s2ri
